Hawaii statutes.
[§602-56] Absence, disability, of the chief
judge. Whenever, by the provisions of any law of the State, any act is
required to be prepared by the chief judge of the intermediate appellate court,
the act may be performed, in case of a vacancy, or illness, absence or
disability, by an associate judge designated in accordance with the rules of
the supreme court. [L 1979, c 111, pt of §3]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next